Hawaii, session 2026, SB3222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 313, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, is amended by amending section 2 to read as follows: "SECTION 2.  (a) There is established a five-year food hub pilot program, which shall be administered by the department of agriculture[.] and biosecurity. (b) The food hub pilot program shall: (1)  Adopt the United States Department of Agriculture's working definition of "food hub", which means "a centrally located facility with a business management structure facilitating the aggregation, storage, processing, distribution, and/or marketing of locally/regionally produced food products"; and (2)  Award grant funding to qualified applicants for the construction of critical infrastructure to establish and expand food hubs in each of the counties, including: (A)  Construction or improvement of facilities for aggregation, washing, minimal processing, packaging, cold storage, and other value‑additions; and (B)  Provision of technical assistance to develop in‑state capacity to supply state institutions and other markets. (c) The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall establish criteria for the award of initial start-up grant funding or subsequent expansion funding under the food hub pilot program, including the following provisions: (1)  Priority shall be given to organizations having demonstrated experience in aggregation, washing, minimal processing, packaging, cold storage, and other value-additions for delivering local produce to local markets; (2)  Qualifying applicants shall include corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, sole proprietorships, non-profit organizations, and agricultural cooperatives that meet necessary insurance requirements and provide a certificate of vendor compliance with Hawaii compliance express; (3)  Applicants seeking to establish a new food hub where none currently exist shall first secure a physical location for the food hub and draft a detailed plan for the food hub's operation, including activities in which the applicant intends to engage, such as serving as a marketplace for buying and selling, or providing certified kitchen space in which multiple farmers may share use of facilities for value-added product development; and (4)  Applicants shall explain their intended actions to increase access to locally produced food. (d)  The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall require that the receipt of grant funding pursuant to the food hub pilot program be conditioned upon the recipient's compliance with all applicable state and federal food safety laws, rules, and regulations, including the FDA Food Safety Modernization Act, P.L. 111-353, and that Act's provisions on supplier verification[.]; provided that certification under the groupGAP food safety certification program established by the United States Department of Agriculture shall qualify a recipient for grant funding. (e) The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the administration and operation of the food hub pilot program. (f)  The food hub pilot program under this section shall terminate on June 30, 2027." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the continued implementation of the food hub pilot program established pursuant to Act 313, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________